Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.400.020

Directors' and superintendents' signatures filed with auditor.

Every school district director and school district superintendent, on assuming the duties of his or her office, shall place his or her signature, certified to by some school district official, on file in the office of the county auditor.

[ 1990 c 33 s 377; 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.58.140. Prior: 1909 c 97 p 289 s 12; RRS s 4787; prior: 1897 c 118 s 61; 1890 p 380 s 70. Formerly RCW 28A.58.140, 28.58.140.]